Wisconsin, session 2025, AB444.
do enact as follows:AB444,14Section 1. 20.935 of the statutes is created to read:AB444,2,2520.935 No use of state or local facilities to detain individuals on the 1basis of immigration status; no state or local funding of immigrant 2detention facilities. (1) Definitions. In this section:AB444,2,33(a) “Political subdivision” means a city, village, town, or county.AB444,2,64(b) “State agency” means an association, authority, board, department, 5commission, independent agency, institution, office, society, or other body in state 6government created or authorized to be created by the constitution or any law.AB444,2,127(2) Detention in state or local facilities prohibited. No state agency, 8political subdivision, or county sheriff may use or permit the federal government to 9use a facility owned or operated by the state agency, political subdivision, or county 10sheriff, including any carceral facility, to detain or hold in custody an individual if 11the individual is being detained or held in custody solely on the basis of the 12individual’s immigration status.AB444,2,1613(3) Funding to establish or operate immigrant detention facilities 14prohibited. No state agency, political subdivision, or county sheriff may expend 15moneys to establish or operate, or to assist in the establishment or operation of, an 16immigrant detention facility in this state.AB444,2,1717